gc_lang/fr/oxt/Dictionnaires/dictionaries/fr-reforme1990.aff
FLAG long
SFX xS Y 39
SFX xS ivre ivre/n'q'd'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivant/n'q'd'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre is/j'n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre it/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivons/n'q'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivez/n'q'l'm' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivent/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivais/j'n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivait/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivions/n'q'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre iviez/n'q'l'm' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivaient/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre écus/j'n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre écut/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre écûmes/n'q'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre écûtes/n'q'l'm' vivre
SFX xS ivre écurent/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrai/j'n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivras/n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivra/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrons/n'q'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrez/n'q'l'm' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivront/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrais/j'n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrait/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrions/n'q'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivriez/n'q'l'm' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivraient/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ive/j'n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre ives/n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre écusse/j'n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre écusses/n'q'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre écût/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre écussions/n'q'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre écussiez/n'q'l'm' vivre
SFX xS ivre écussent/n'q'l'm't's' vivre
SFX xS ivre is/n'l'm't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivons/n'l't' vivre
SFX xS ivre ivez/n'l'm' vivre

SFX y1 Y 43
SFX y1 crire crire/n'q'd'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivant/n'q'd'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crit/L'D'Q' crire
SFX y1 crire crits/D'Q' crire
SFX y1 crire crite/L'D'Q' crire
SFX y1 crire crites/D'Q' crire
SFX y1 crire cris/j'n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crit/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivons/n'q'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivez/n'q'l'm' crire
SFX y1 crire crivent/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivais/j'n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivait/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivions/n'q'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire criviez/n'q'l'm' crire
SFX y1 crire crivaient/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivis/j'n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivit/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivîmes/n'q'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivîtes/n'q'l'm' crire
SFX y1 crire crivirent/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crirai/j'n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire criras/n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crira/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crirons/n'q'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire crirez/n'q'l'm' crire
SFX y1 crire criront/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crirais/j'n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crirait/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire cririons/n'q'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire cririez/n'q'l'm' crire
SFX y1 crire criraient/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crive/j'n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crives/n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivisse/j'n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivisses/n'q'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivît/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire crivissions/n'q'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivissiez/n'q'l'm' crire
SFX y1 crire crivissent/n'q'l'm't's' crire
SFX y1 crire cris/n'l'm't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivons/n'l't' crire
SFX y1 crire crivez/n'l'm' crire

SFX yA Y 43
SFX yA ire ire/n'q'd'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire isant/n'q'd'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire u/L'D'Q' lire
SFX yA ire us/D'Q' lire
SFX yA ire ue/L'D'Q' lire
SFX yA ire ues/D'Q' lire
SFX yA ire is/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire it/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire isons/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yA ire isez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yA ire isent/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire isais/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire isait/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire isions/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yA ire isiez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yA ire isaient/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire us/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire ut/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire ûmes/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yA ire ûtes/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yA ire urent/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire irai/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire iras/n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire ira/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire irons/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yA ire irez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yA ire iront/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire irais/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire irait/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire irions/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yA ire iriez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yA ire iraient/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire ise/j'n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire ises/n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire usse/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire usses/n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire ût/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire ussions/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yA ire ussiez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yA ire ussent/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yA ire is/n'l'm't' lire
SFX yA ire isons/n'l't' lire
SFX yA ire isez/n'l'm' lire

SFX yB Y 43
SFX yB lire lire/n'q'd'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lisant/n'q'd'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lu/L'D'Q' lire
SFX yB lire lus/D'Q' lire
SFX yB lire lue/L'D'Q' lire
SFX yB lire lues/D'Q' lire
SFX yB lire lis/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lit/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lisons/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yB lire lisez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yB lire lisent/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lisais/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lisait/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lisions/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yB lire lisiez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yB lire lisaient/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lus/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lut/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lûmes/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yB lire lûtes/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yB lire lurent/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lirai/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire liras/n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lira/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lirons/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yB lire lirez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yB lire liront/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lirais/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lirait/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lirions/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yB lire liriez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yB lire liraient/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lise/j'n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lises/n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lusse/j'n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lusses/n'q'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lût/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lussions/n'q'l't' lire
SFX yB lire lussiez/n'q'l'm' lire
SFX yB lire lussent/n'q'l'm't's' lire
SFX yB lire lis/n'l'm't' lire
SFX yB lire lisons/n'l't' lire
SFX yB lire lisez/n'l'm' lire

SFX yC Y 41
SFX yC ire ire/n'q'd'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire isant/n'q'd'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire it/L'D'Q' dire
SFX yC ire its/D'Q' dire
SFX yC ire ite/L'D'Q' dire
SFX yC ire ites/D'Q' dire
SFX yC ire is/j'n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire it/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire isons/n'q'l't' dire
SFX yC ire ites/n'q'l'm' dire
SFX yC ire isent/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire isais/j'n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire isait/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire isions/n'q'l't' dire
SFX yC ire isiez/n'q'l'm' dire
SFX yC ire isaient/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire îmes/n'q'l't' dire
SFX yC ire îtes/n'q'l'm' dire
SFX yC ire irent/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire irai/j'n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire iras/n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire ira/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire irons/n'q'l't' dire
SFX yC ire irez/n'q'l'm' dire
SFX yC ire iront/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire irais/j'n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire irait/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire irions/n'q'l't' dire
SFX yC ire iriez/n'q'l'm' dire
SFX yC ire iraient/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire ise/j'n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire ises/n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire isse/j'n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire isses/n'q'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire ît/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire issions/n'q'l't' dire
SFX yC ire issiez/n'q'l'm' dire
SFX yC ire issent/n'q'l'm't's' dire
SFX yC ire is/n'l'm't' dire
SFX yC ire isons/n'l't' dire
SFX yC ire ites/n'l'm' dire
